Utah statutes.
63G-9-204.   Record of proceedings.

The board must keep a record of all its proceedings, and any member may cause the member's dissent to the action of a majority upon any matter to be entered upon such record.  An abstract of all claims must be entered upon the minutes of the board before the same are acted upon.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

